North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 143A-1.
Short title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Executive Organization Act of 1971.”

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

Government Efficiency and Reform.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.5(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall contract for a Government Efficiency and Reform review and analysis of the executive branch of State government, which shall be known as NC GEAR. The purpose of the review and analysis is to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of State government and to identify specific strategies for making State government more efficient and effective. The review and analysis may examine entire departments, agencies, institutions, or similar programs in different departments. The review and analysis shall include an examination of the efficiency and effectiveness of major management policies, practices, and functions pertaining to the following areas:

“(1) The statutory authority, funding sources, and functions of each department, agency, institution, or program.

“(2) The organizational structure and staffing patterns in place to perform these functions and whether they are appropriate based on comparative data and other reasonable staffing criteria.

“(3) The measurement of each reviewed program’s outcomes, overall performance, and success in accomplishing its mandated or stated mission and subsequent goals, considering the resources provided to the program.

“(4) State and local responsibilities for providing government services and funding for those services, and whether these responsibilities should be reallocated.

(5) Personnel systems operations and management.

“(6) State purchasing operations and management.

“(7) Information technology and telecommunications systems policy, organization, and management.

“(8) The identification of opportunities to reduce fragmentation, duplication, and related or overlapping services or activities through restructuring of departmental organizations and streamlining programs.

“(b) All executive branch departments, agencies, boards, commissions, authorities, and institutions in the executive branch of State government, including receipt-supported agencies, and all non-State entities receiving State funds shall be subject to review and analysis. The chief administrative officer of each entity shall ensure full cooperation with the Office of State Budget and Management and provide timely responses to the Office of State Budget and Management’s request for information under the provisions of G.S. 143C-2-1(b).

“(c) The Office of State Budget and Management will work collaboratively with the Office of State Auditor to develop the review, analysis, and findings needed to produce a final report and recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly.

“(d) The contracting provisions of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and related State purchasing and budget regulations do not apply to NC GEAR; however, the Office of State Budget and Management shall report all external contracts for consultants or professional services within 30 days of their execution to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Fiscal Research Division, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(e) The Office of State Budget and Management shall submit an interim report of the NC GEAR’s analysis, findings, and recommendations to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Program Evaluation Division by February 15, 2014, and a final report by February 15, 2015.

“(f) Funds appropriated for NC GEAR shall be used to contract with consultants and other experts and to pay for travel, postage, printing, planning, and other related costs as needed to accomplish the objectives specified for the project. Funds appropriated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium for NC GEAR shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available for expenditure for the project.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.’ ”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 38.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 38.5, is a severability clause.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Narrowing Chevron’s Domain,” see 70 Duke L.J. 931 (2021).

For article, “Fifty-First Annual Administrative Law Symposium:
The Future of Chevron Deference:
Symposium Article:
Retheorizing Precedent,” see 70 Duke L.J. 1025 (2021).

§ 143A-2.
Head of department defined.

Whenever the term “head of the department” is used it shall mean the head of one of the principal departments created by this Chapter.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

§ 143A-3.
Agency defined.

Whenever the term “agency” is used it shall mean and include, as the context may require, an existing department, institution, commission, committee, board, division, bureau, officer or official.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Loud and Soft Anti-Chevron Decisions,” see 53 Wake Forest L. Rev. 37 (2018).

For article, “Perez: A Call for a Renewed Look at Chevron, Jurisdictional Questions, and Statutory Silence,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 173 (2018).

For article, “Remedial Chevron,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (2018).

For article, “Fifty-First Annual Administrative Law Symposium:
The Future of Chevron Deference:
Symposium Article:
Chevronizing Around Cost-Benefit Analysis,” see 70 Duke L.J. 1109 (2021).

For article, “Disagreement About Chevron:
Is Administrative Law the ‘Law of Public Administration’?,” see 70 Duke L.J. Online 111 (2021).

§ 143A-4.
Policy-making authority and administrative powers of Governor; delegation.

The Governor, in accordance with Article III of the Constitution of North Carolina, shall be the chief executive officer of the State. Subject to the Constitution and laws of this State, the Governor shall be responsible for formulating and administering the policies of the executive branch of the State government. Where a conflict arises in connection with the administration of the policies of the executive branch of the State government with respect to the reorganization of State government, such conflict shall be resolved by the Governor, and the decision of the Governor shall be final.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

§ 143A-5.
Office of the Lieutenant Governor.

The Lieutenant Governor shall maintain an office in the Hawkins-Hartness House located at 310 North Blount Street in the City of Raleigh which office shall be open during normal working hours throughout the year. The Lieutenant Governor shall serve as President of the Senate and perform such additional duties as the Governor or General Assembly may assign to him. This section shall become effective January 1, 1973.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1; 2017-10, s. 2.10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-10, s. 2.10, effective May 4, 2017, substituted “the Hawkins-Hartness House located at 310 North Blount Street ” for “a State building. ”

§ 143A-6.
Types of transfers.

Under this Chapter, a Type I transfer means the transferring of all or part of an existing agency to a principal department established by this Chapter. When all or part of any agency is transferred to a principal department under a Type I transfer, its statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations or other funds, including the functions of budgeting and purchasing, are transferred to the principal department.When any agency, or part thereof, is transferred by a Type I transfer to a principal department under the provisions of this Chapter, all its prescribed powers, duties, and functions, including but not limited to rule making, regulation, licensing, and promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the head of the principal department into which the agency, or part thereof, has been transferred.

Under this Chapter, a Type II transfer means the transferring intact of an existing agency, or part thereof, to a principal department established by this Chapter. When any agency, or part thereof, is transferred to a principal department under a Type II transfer, that agency, or part thereof, shall be administered under the direction and supervision of that principal department, but shall exercise all its prescribed statutory powers independently of the head of the principal department, except that under a Type II transfer the management functions of any transferred agency, or part thereof, shall be performed under the direction and supervision of the head of the principal department.

Whenever the term “management functions” is used it shall mean planning, organizing, staffing, directing, coordinating, reporting and budgeting.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

§ 143A-7.
Agencies not enumerated; continuation.

Any existing department, institution, board or commission not enumerated in this Chapter but established or created by the General Assembly shall continue to exercise all its powers, duties and functions.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

§ 143A-8.
Internal organization of departments; allocation and reallocation of duties and functions; limitations.

The Governor shall cause the administrative organization of each department to be examined with a view to promoting economy and efficiency. The Governor may reorganize and organize the principal departments and assign and reassign the duties and functions among the divisions and other units, division heads, officers, and employees; except as otherwise expressly provided by statute. When such changes affect existing law they must be submitted in accordance with Article III, Sec. 5 of the Constitution. The head of a principal department shall have legal custody of all books, papers, documents and other records of the department. The head of a principal department shall be responsible for the preparation and presentation of the department budget request which shall include all funds requested and all receipts expected for all elements of the department.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1.

§ 143A-9.
Appointment of officers and employees; salaries of department heads.

Any provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, and subject to the provisions of the Constitution of the State of North Carolina, the head of a principal department, except those departments headed by elected officials who are constitutional officers, shall be appointed by the Governor and serve at his pleasure.

The head of a principal department shall appoint the chief deputy or chief assistant and such chief deputy or chief assistant shall be subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act. Except where appointment by the Governor is prescribed by existing statute, the head of the principal department shall appoint the administrative head of each transferred agency and, subject to the provisions of the North Carolina Human Resources Act, appoint all employees of each division, section or other unit under a principal department.

In establishing the position of secretary, and the supporting staff for the principal departments, the cost of such staff positions will be met insofar as possible by utilizing existing positions or funds available from vacant positions within agencies assigned to the principal departments.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 50; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 143A-10.
Governor; continuation of powers and duties; staff.

All powers, duties and functions vested by law in the Governor or in the office of Governor are continued, except as otherwise provided by this Chapter.

The immediate staff of the Governor shall not be subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1; 2006-203, s. 100; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 143A-11.
Principal departments.

Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, or the State Constitution, all executive and administrative powers, duties and functions, not including those of the General Assembly and the judiciary, previously vested by law in the several State agencies, are vested in the following principal offices or departments:

Office of the Governor.

Office of the Lieutenant Governor.

Department of the Secretary of State.

Department of State Auditor.

Department of State Treasurer.

Department of Public Instruction.

Department of Justice.

Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Department of Labor.

Department of Insurance.

through (13) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 96.

(14)

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 6.

(15),

(16) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 509, s. 96.

(17),

(18) Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 6.

(19)

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 620, s. 9.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 6; c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(120); c. 751, s. 7(17); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 36; 1993, c. 522, s. 12; 1995, c. 509, s. 96; 1997-261, s. 93.

Cross References.

As to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, see G.S. 143B-49 et seq.

As to the Department of Revenue, see G.S. 143B-217 et seq.

§ 143A-12.
Office of the Governor; creation.

There is hereby created an office of the Governor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 2.

§ 143A-13.
Office of the Lieutenant Governor; creation.

There is hereby created an office of the Lieutenant Governor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 3.

§ 143A-14.
Creation of new departments by executive order.

All departments not now in existence which this Chapter directs to be created shall be made operative by executive order of the Governor; provided that all new departments shall be activated by executive order not later than July 1, 1972.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 21.

§ 143A-15.
Date of transfer of agencies into existing departments.

The transfer of all agencies into departments of State government which now exist shall take place not later than October 1, 1971.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 21.

§ 143A-16.
Transfer of funds by Governor.

To implement this Chapter, the Governor shall have authority to transfer all or a part of any appropriations or funds of an agency to the department to which such agency is transferred.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 21.

§ 143A-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 11.

§ 143A-18.
Additional funds for reorganization.

When adequate funds to implement reorganization are not available from the budgets of the transferred agencies, the Governor and the Council of State may make other funds available for these purposes, not to exceed a total of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per year for all departments created by this Chapter.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 21.